Utah statutes.
63C-7-201.   Establishment of the Utah Communications Agency Network.

(1)  There is established the Utah Communications Agency Network, formerly the Utah Wireless Interagency Network, created by executive order of the governor on June 6, 1996.  The Utah Communications Agency Network shall assume the operations of the Utah Wireless Interagency Network on May 4, 1997, and shall perform the functions as provided in this chapter.

(2)  The Utah Communications Agency Network is an independent state agency and not a division within any other department of the state.

(3)  The initial offices of the Utah Communications Agency Network shall be in Salt Lake City, but branches of the office may be established in other areas of the state upon approval of the board.

(4) (a)  As soon after the effective date as possible, the state representatives shall schedule an organizational meeting date and shall give written notice of the time and location of the organizational meeting to the governing bodies of known prospective members.

(b)  At the organizational meeting:

(i) the board shall be organized as provided in Section 63C-7-203;

(ii)  bylaws shall be adopted; and

(iii)  the executive committee shall be established as provided in Section 63C-7-205.

